Washington statutes.
RCW 43.19.011

Director—Powers and duties.

(1) The director of enterprise services shall supervise and administer the activities of the department of enterprise services and shall advise the governor and the legislature with respect to matters under the jurisdiction of the department.

(2) In addition to other powers and duties granted to the director, the director shall have the following powers and duties:

(a) Enter into contracts on behalf of the state to carry out the purposes of this chapter;

(b) Accept and expend gifts and grants that are related to the purposes of this chapter, whether such grants be of federal or other funds;

(c) Appoint deputy and assistant directors and such other special assistants as may be needed to administer the department. These employees are exempt from the provisions of chapter 41.06 RCW;

(d) Adopt rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW and perform all other functions necessary and proper to carry out the purposes of this chapter;

(e) Delegate powers, duties, and functions as the director deems necessary for efficient administration, but the director shall be responsible for the official acts of the officers and employees of the department;

(f) Apply for grants from public and private entities, and receive and administer any grant funding received for the purpose and intent of this chapter; and

(g) Perform other duties as are necessary and consistent with law.

(3) The director may establish additional advisory groups as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 201; 1999 c 229 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.